Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 3.4. The Groundwater Act of 1973.

§§ 62.1-44.83 through 62.1-44.107.

Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 812.

Cross references.

For the Ground Water Management Act of 1992, see §

62.1-254

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former § 62.1-44.88, was repealed by Acts 1984, c. 734. Former § 62.1-44.101, was repealed by Acts 1986, c. 401. Former § 62.1-44.106 was repealed by Acts 1986, c. 615.